en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Figure Skating & Hockey > Hockey Goals: Hockey Goal Backstops; Hockey Goal Nets; Mini Hockey Goals
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Eiskunstlauf & Hockey > Hockeytore: Hockey-Auffangnetze; Hockey-Tornetze; Mini-Hockeytore
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Patinage artistique et hockey > Buts de hockey: Pare-rondelles de but de hockey; Filets de but de hockey; Mini-buts de hockey
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 피겨 스케이팅/하키 > 하키 골대: 하키 골대 백스톱; 하키 골 네트; 미니 하키 골대
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Krasokorčuľovanie a hokej > Hokejové bránky: Zarážky na hokejové bránky; Siete na hokejové bránky; Bránky na mini hokej
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Krasobruslení a hokej > Hokejové branky: Hokejové záchytné sítě; Sítě do hokejových branek; Mini hokejové branky
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Dailusis čiuožimas ir ledo ritulys > Ledo ritulio vartai: Ledo ritulio vartų užtvarai; Ledo ritulio vartų tinklai; Mini ledo ritulio vartai
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Хоккей и фигурное катание > Хоккейные ворота: Заградительные сетки для хоккейных ворот; Сетки для хоккейных ворот; Мини-ворота для хоккея
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Trượt băng nghệ thuật và khúc côn cầu > Cầu môn môn khúc côn cầu: Lưới chắn khung thành khúc côn cầu; Lưới khung thành khúc côn cầu; Khung thành khúc côn cầu mini
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Umjetničko klizanje i hokej > Golovi za hokej: Zaštita za golove za hokej; Mreže za gol za hokej; Golovi za mini hokej
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Taitoluistelu ja jääkiekko > Jääkiekkomaalit: Jääkiekkomaalin taustaverkot; Jääkiekkomaalin verkot; Minijääkiekkomaalit
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Artistik Paten ve Hokey > Hokey Kaleleri: Hokey kalesi güvenlik fileleri; Hokey kale fileleri; Mini hokey kaleleri
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Patinaj artistic și hochei > Porți de hochei: Protectoare spate pentru poarta de hochei; Fileuri de poartă pentru hochei; Miniporți de hochei
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 花样滑冰与冰球 > 冰球/曲棍球门: 冰球球门挡网; 冰球球门网; 迷你冰球球门
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Łyżwiarstwo figurowe i hokej > Bramki hokejowe: Siatki ochronne do bramek hokejowych; Siatki na bramki hokejowe; Mini bramki hokejowe
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Műkorcsolya és jégkorong > Jégkorongkapuk: Hokikapu felfogóhálók; Hokikapu hálók; Mini hokikapuk
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > フィギュアスケート・アイスホッケー用品 > アイスホッケー用ゴール: ホッケーゴール用バックストップ; ホッケー用ゴールネット; ミニホッケーゴール
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 花式滑冰/冰上曲棍球 > 曲棍球門: 曲棍球球門擋網; 冰球球門網; 迷你曲棍球球門
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > สเกตลีลาและฮอกกี้ > ประตูสำหรับฮอกกี้: ตาข่ายดักลูกฮอกกี้; ตาข่ายประตูฮอกกี้; ประตูฮอกกี้ขนาดเล็ก
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Hóquei e patinagem artística > Balizas para hóquei: Redes de proteção para balizas de hóquei; Redes de baliza de hóquei; Minibalizas de hóquei
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Καλλιτεχνικό πατινάζ & χόκεϊ > Τέρματα χόκεϊ: Δίχτυα ανάσχεσης για τέρματα χόκεϊ; Δίχτυα τέρματος χόκεϊ; Μίνι τέρματα χόκεϊ
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Patinação artística e hóquei > Traves de hóquei: Redes de contenção para gol de hóquei; Redes de gol de hóquei; Mini gols de hóquei
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Umetnostno drsanje in hokej > Goli za hokej: Zadrževalne pregrade za hokejski gol; Mreže za gole za hokej; Majhni goli za hokej
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Konståkning och hockey > Hockeymål: Fångstnät för ishockeymål; Ishockeynät; Miniishockeymål
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pattinaggio di figura e hockey > Porte da hockey: Reti di protezione per porte da hockey; Reti per porte da hockey; Mini porte da hockey
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Kunstløp og hockey > Hockeymål: Stoppnett for hockeymål; Målnett for hockey; Minihockeymål
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Patinaje artístico y hockey > Porterías de hockey: Redes de contención para porterías de hockey; Redes de portería de hockey; Mini porterías de hockey
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Kunstskøjteløb og ishockey > Hockeymål: Backstops til hockeymål; Målnet til hockey; Mini-hockeymål
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Фигурно пързаляне и хокей > Врати за хокей: Задни мрежи за хокейни врати; Мрежи за хокейни врати; Мини врати за хокей
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Kunstrijden en ijshockey > Hockeydoelen: Vangnetten voor hockeydoelen; Netten voor hockeydoelen; Mini-hockeydoelen